Maryland, session 2025, HB0491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 19 – St. Mary’s County
113–13.
A. In addition to any other powers and penalties contained in this chapter, the
Metropolitan Commission may discontinue water and sewer service for nonpayment of any
service, connection, inspection, benefit or any other charge if not paid within thirty (30)
days of the due date.
B. In addition to payment of the bill, the Metropolitan Commission shall collect
a turn–off and turn–on charge before resuming service.
C. (1) THE METROPOLITAN COMMISSION MAY DISCONTINUE ALL OR
ANY PART OF WATER OR SEWER SERVICE PROVIDED TO AN IMPROVED PRIVATE
PROPERTY DETERMINED TO BE UNSAFE, UNFIT, OR UNSUITABLE FOR HUMAN
OCCUPANCY DUE TO AN ACCIDENT, ARTIFICIAL DISASTER, OR NATURAL DISASTER.
(2) WHEN SERVICE IS DISCONTINUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
READY–TO–SERVE CHARGE FOR THE PROPERTY SHALL BE SUSPENDED AT THE TIME
OF DISCONTINUANCE AND REMAIN SUSPENDED UNTIL THE SERVICE IS RESTORED.
– 1 –

Ch. 599 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
113–21.
C. (1) The Metropolitan Commission may utilize administrative enforcement
remedies or seek judicial enforcement remedies for a violation of any rules and regulations
the Metropolitan Commission may adopt under this chapter concerning public WATER AND
sewer use, including [public sewer drains, the installation of building sewer] LINES, AND
MAINS, ALL APPURTENANCES, connections, and [the discharge of waters and wastes]
DISCHARGES into the public sewer systems. The Metropolitan Commission shall establish
procedures for implementing the enforcement remedies authorized under this subsection.
(2) The Metropolitan Commission may utilize administrative enforcement
remedies that may include:
(A) A notification of a violation;
(B) A consent order;
(C) A show cause hearing;
(D) A compliance order;
(E) A cease and desist order;
(F) An administrative fine not to exceed one thousand dollars
($1,000.00) per violation, per day;
(G) An assessment for the reimbursement of actual costs incurred by
the Metropolitan Commission, including, but not limited to, time and materials[, if such
costs are less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)]; or
(H) An emergency suspension.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –